Tennessee statutes. Title 62 Professions, Businesses and Trades
Part 1

General Provisions

62-13-101. Title.

This chapter shall be known and may be cited as the “Tennessee Real Estate Broker License Act of 1973.”

Acts 1973, ch. 181, § 1; T.C.A., § 62-1301.

Cross-References. Discriminatory housing practices, title 4, ch. 21, part 6.

Liability of professional societies, title 62, ch. 50, part 1.

Real estate appraisers, title 62, ch. 39.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 5 Tenn. Juris., Brokers, §§ 3, 4, 15, 23; 6 Tenn. Juris., Commercial Law, § 12; 17 Tenn. Juris., Licenses, § 9.

Law Reviews.

Rights and Liabilities of Real Estate Brokers in Tennessee, 23 Tenn. L. Rev. 1005.

62-13-102. Chapter definitions.

As used in this chapter, unless the context otherwise requires:

“Acquisition agent” means a person who by means of personal inducement, solicitation, or otherwise attempts directly to encourage any person to attend a sales presentation for a time-share program; provided, however, that “acquisition agent” shall not include any person or that person's employee who engages in any such activity solely on real property owned or leased by the person on or within the premises of a hotel, motel, private resort or lodging rental office or phone or mail solicitation business;

“Adverse facts” means conditions or occurrences generally recognized by competent licensees that have negative impact on the value of the real estate, significantly reduce the structural integrity of improvements to real property or present a significant health risk to occupants of the property;

“Affiliate broker” means any person engaged under contract by or on behalf of a licensed broker to participate in any activity included in subdivision (4);

“Broker” means any person who, for a fee, commission, finders fee or any other valuable consideration or with the intent or expectation of receiving a fee, commission, finders fee or any other valuable consideration from another, solicits, negotiates or attempts to solicit or negotiate the listing, sale, purchase, exchange, lease or option to buy, sell, rent or exchange for any real estate or of the improvements on the real estate or any time-share interval as defined in the Tennessee Time-Share Act, compiled in title 66, chapter 32, part 1, collects rents or attempts to collect rents, auctions or offers to auction or who advertises or holds out as engaged in any of the foregoing;

“Broker” also includes any person employed by or on behalf of the owner or owners of lots or other parcels of real estate, at a salary, fee, commission or any other valuable consideration, to sell the real estate or any part of the real estate, in lots or parcels or other disposition of the real estate. It also includes any person who engages in the business of charging an advance fee or contracting for collection of a fee in connection with any contract whereby the person undertakes primarily to promote the sale of real estate either through its listing in a publication issued primarily for that purpose or for referral of information concerning the real estate to brokers, or both;

“Client” means a party to a transaction with whom the broker has entered into a specific written agency agreement to provide services;

“Customer” means any party, other than a client in a transaction, for whom or to whom a licensee provides services;

“Designated agent” refers to a licensee who has been chosen by the licensee's managing broker to serve as the agent of an actual or prospective party to a transaction, to the exclusion of other licensees employed by or affiliated with the broker;

“Dual agency” refers to a situation in which the licensee has agreements to provide services as an agent to more than one (1) party in a specific transaction and in which the interests of the parties are adverse;

“Facilitator” means any licensee:

Who assists one (1) or more parties to a transaction who has not entered into a specific written agency agreement representing one (1) or more of the parties; or

Whose specific written agency agreement provides that if the licensee or someone associated with the licensee also represents another party to the same transaction, the licensee shall be deemed to be a facilitator and not a dual agent; provided, that notice of assumption of facilitator status is provided to the buyer and seller immediately upon the assumption of facilitator status, to be confirmed in writing prior to execution of the contract. A facilitator may advise either or both of the parties to a transaction but cannot be considered a representative or advocate of either party. “Transaction broker” may be used synonymously with, or in lieu of, “facilitator” as used in any disclosures, forms or agreements under this chapter;

“Limited agency” means an agency relationship created for the purpose of providing real estate services in which the client's or other party's liability for the actions or statements of an agent, subagent or facilitator is limited to actions or statements initiated by specific instruction of the client or other party or those actions or statements about which the client or other party had knowledge;

“Material” means any statement, representation or fact relative to a transaction that would affect a reasonable person's decision to enter into an agreement and that has been identified by the person as being of significance to a particular party;

“Party” means any person or persons seeking to obtain or divest an interest in real estate or a business opportunity as a buyer, seller, landlord, tenant, option grantee or option grantor;

“Person” means and includes individuals, corporations, partnerships or associations, foreign and domestic;

“Real estate” means and includes leaseholds, as well as any other interest or estate in land, whether corporeal, incorporeal, freehold or nonfreehold, and whether the real estate is situated in this state or elsewhere;

“Time-share salesperson” means any person acting as a seller of any time-share interval under contract with or control of a licensed real estate broker pursuant to a registered time-share program. Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, a licensed broker or affiliate broker is entitled to sell time-share intervals pursuant to a registered time-share program; and

“Transaction” means the purchase, sale, rental or option of an interest in real estate or business opportunity.

Acts 1973, ch. 181, § 3; 1981, ch. 372, § 32; 1981, ch. 473, § 1; T.C.A., § 62-1302; Acts 1989, ch. 89, § 1; 1995, ch. 246, § 1; 1996, ch. 772, §§ 1-3; 2002, ch. 812, § 1.

Cross-References. Occupation tax on brokers, title 67, ch. 4, part 17.

Single act identifies broker or affiliate, § 62-13-103.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 5 Tenn. Juris., Brokers, §§ 2, 4; 17 Tenn. Juris., Licenses, § 9.

Attorney General Opinions. Applicability of exemption provided to “corporation, foreign or domestic” in T.C.A. § 62-13-104(a)(1)(F). OAG 14-27, 2014 Tenn. AG LEXIS 28 (3/6/14).

62-13-103. Broker or affiliate identified by single act.

Any person who, directly or indirectly for another, with the intention or upon the promise of receiving any valuable consideration, offers, attempts or agrees to perform or performs any single act defined in § 62-13-102, whether as a part of a transaction or as an entire transaction, is deemed a broker, affiliate broker or time-share salesperson within the meaning of this chapter.

The commission of a single such act by a person required to be licensed under this chapter and not so licensed constitutes a violation of this chapter.

Acts 1973, ch. 181, § 4; T.C.A., § 62-1304; Acts 1989, ch. 89, § 2.

Cross-References. Penalty, § 62-13-110.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 17 Tenn. Juris., Licenses, § 14.

62-13-104. Exemptions — Firm licenses for vacation lodging services.

This chapter does not apply to:

An owner of real estate with respect to property owned or leased by such person;

An attorney-in-fact under a duly executed and recorded power of attorney from the owner or lessor;

The services rendered by an attorney at law in the performance of duties as an attorney at law;

A person acting as receiver, trustee in bankruptcy, administrator, executor or guardian, trustee acting under a trust agreement, deed of trust or will or while acting under a court order or instrument;

A resident manager for a broker or an owner, or employee of a broker, who manages an apartment building, duplex or residential complex where the person's duties are limited to supervision, exhibition of residential units, leasing or collection of security deposits and rentals from the property. The resident manager or employee shall not negotiate the amounts of security deposits or rentals and shall not negotiate any leases on behalf of the broker; or

A corporation, foreign or domestic, acting through an officer duly authorized to engage in a real estate transaction, where the transaction occurs as an incident to the management, lease, sale or other disposition of real estate owned by the corporation; however, this exemption does not apply to a person who performs an act described in § 62-13-102(4)(A), either as a vocation or for compensation, if the amount of the compensation is dependent upon, or directly related to, the value of the real estate with respect to which the act is performed.

In addition, except as provided in subsection (b), no other provisions of this chapter or any rules and regulations promulgated pursuant thereto shall apply to vacation lodging services.

As used in this section, unless the context otherwise requires:

“Designated agent” means an owner, principal, officer or upper level manager of a vacation lodging service firm;

“Person” means any natural person, corporation, company, partnership, firm or association; and

“Vacation lodging service” means any person that engages in the business of providing the services of management, marketing, booking and rental of residential units owned by others as sleeping accommodations furnished for pay to transients or travelers staying no more than fourteen (14) days.

Each vacation lodging service shall be required to have a vacation lodging service firm license but shall not be required to have a licensed real estate broker supervising the business. The application for the license shall be filed in the office of the real estate commission on forms that the commission may prescribe and shall be accompanied by a fee for the issuance of the license as specified in § 62-13-308.

Vacation lodging service firm licenses for vacation lodging services shall be granted to all applicants who bear a good reputation for honesty, trustworthiness, integrity and competence to transact the business of providing vacation lodging services in a manner to safeguard the interest of the public and only after satisfactory proof of such qualifications has been presented to the commission. No license shall be denied any person because of race, color, religion, sex or national origin, handicap or familial status.

Upon application for a firm license for a vacation lodging service and each renewal of the license, the firm shall designate one (1) individual from that firm who shall be individually licensed as a designated agent through the Tennessee real estate commission. Such designated agent shall be responsible for the completion of training programs to be taught by an individual in the vacation lodging services business or other person who meets qualifications set by the Tennessee real estate commission. Such training programs shall consist of instruction in the fundamentals of this subsection (b) and related topics. No person shall be licensed by the commission as a designated agent until such person completes the required eight-hour introductory course.

Every two (2) years, as a requisite for the reissuance of a firm license for a vacation lodging service and for reissuance of the designated agent license, the firm shall furnish certification that the designated agent for the firm has completed eight (8) classroom hours in training programs approved by the commission.

No examination shall be required for the issuance or renewal of a firm license for a vacation lodging service.

Upon application for a firm license for a vacation lodging service and each renewal of the license, the firm shall provide proof of the establishment of the firm's escrow account satisfactory to the commission. Every firm shall, in accordance with the rules promulgated by the commission under § 62-13-203, keep an escrow or trustee account of funds deposited with the firm relating to vacation lodging services. The vacation lodging service shall maintain for a period of at least three (3) years accurate records of the account showing:

The depositor of the funds;

The date of deposit;

The payee of the funds; and

Other pertinent information that the commission may require.

No funds shall be distributed from the escrow/trustee account until the customer's stay is complete, unless the distribution is in accordance with terms disclosed to the renter in writing at the time of making the reservation or within a reasonable time thereafter not to exceed three (3) days, mailed to the renter through the United States postal service or transmitted to the renter via electronic mail, facsimile or other tangible form of communication. Commissions earned by the firm and the revenue due owners shall be disbursed at least monthly. Funds held in escrow shall be disbursed in a prompt manner without unreasonable delay.

A vacation lodging service may be exempt from the requirements of subdivision (b)(3)(C) by submitting with its application for a firm license renewal an irrevocable letter of credit from a state or national bank or state or federal savings and loan association having its principal office in this state or any state or national bank or state or federal savings and loan association that has its principal office outside this state and that maintains one (1) or more branches in this state that are authorized to accept federally insured deposits. The terms and conditions of any irrevocable letter of credit shall be subject to the approval of the commission. At the discretion of the bank or savings and loan association, the form of the irrevocable letter of credit shall be provided by the bank or savings and loan association and may be based on either the Uniform Commercial Code, compiled in title 47, chapter 5, or the ICC Uniform Customs and Practice for Documentary Credits (UCP 500). In lieu of the irrevocable letter of credit, the commission is authorized to accept equivalent security. The irrevocable letter of credit or equivalent security shall be in the amount of the vacation lodging service's average advanced monthly deposits or other lesser amount that is reasonably determined by the commission to protect the renters and owners. The commission may draw upon the irrevocable letter of credit or equivalent security to reimburse renters or owners for funds owed to them by the vacation lodging service. The commission shall offer the vacation lodging service a contested case hearing under the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in title 4, chapter 5, before drawing upon the irrevocable letter of credit or equivalent security if the vacation lodging service continues to maintain the letter of credit or equivalent security during the contested case hearing process. If the vacation lodging service does not continue to maintain the irrevocable letter of credit or equivalent security during the contested case hearing process and the irrevocable letter of credit or equivalent security is subject to expiring during the contested case hearing process, the commission may draw upon the irrevocable letter of credit or equivalent security before conducting the contested case hearing. Where the commission draws upon the irrevocable letter of credit or equivalent security before conducting a contested case hearing, the commission shall offer the vacation lodging service a prompt hearing to be conducted before it distributes the proceeds. A vacation lodging service firm working under an irrevocable letter of credit must submit satisfactory proof of such letter of credit by April 1 of each year. The commission may impose a penalty for failure to disclose such proof by such date.

All firm and designated agent licenses for vacation lodging services shall expire two (2) years from the date the license was issued or renewed. The firm license and the license for the designated agent for the firm, and all renewals thereof, shall expire at the same time. If a license is issued to a designated agent following the date the firm license is issued or renewed, the license for the designated agent shall be issued or renewed so that it expires on the date the license of the firm is to expire. The commission is authorized to pro-rate the license for the designated agent or extend the date for the renewal of such a license to ensure the licenses expire concurrently. The licenses must be renewed on or before the expiration date by remitting to the commission the fee as set by the commission together with proof of the existence of the firm's escrow account satisfactory to the commission and certification of satisfactory completion of training pursuant to subdivision (b)(3)(B).

Each vacation lodging service shall have an office at a fixed location with adequate facilities located to conform with zoning laws and ordinances. Within ten (10) days after any change of location of the office, the vacation lodging service shall notify the commission in writing of the new business address.

Whenever any lodging rental customer or lodging rental owner claiming to have been injured or damaged by the gross negligence, incompetency, fraud, dishonesty or misconduct on the part of any licensee following the calling or engaging in the business of providing vacation lodging services files suit upon the claim against the licensee in any court of record in this state and recovers judgment on the claim, the court may, as a part of its judgment or decree in such cases, if it deems it a proper case in which so to do, revoke the certificate of license granted under this chapter; and the certificate of license shall not be reissued to the licensee except upon the consenting vote of six (6) members in favor of reissuance.

The commission may, upon its own motion, and shall, upon the verified complaint in writing of any person setting forth a cause of action under this section, ascertain facts and, if warranted, hold a hearing for reprimand or for the suspension or revocation of a license.

The commission has the power to refuse a license for cause or to suspend or revoke a license where it has been obtained by false representation or by fraudulent act or conduct, or where a licensee, in performing or attempting to perform any of the acts mentioned in this section, is found guilty of:

Making any substantial and willful misrepresentation;

Making any promise of a character likely to influence, persuade or induce any person to enter into any contract or agreement when the licensee could not or did not intend to keep the promise;

Pursuing a continued and flagrant course of misrepresentation or making of false promises through other persons, any medium of advertising or otherwise;

Misleading or untruthful advertising, including use of the term “realtor” by a person not authorized to do so, or using any other trade name, insignia or membership in any real estate association or organization of which the licensee is not a member. No vacation lodging service doing business under this subsection (b) may advertise or hold itself out as a full service real estate business. The authority of the business is limited to those activities described within this subsection (b);

Failing, within a reasonable time, to account for or to remit any moneys coming into the licensee's possession that belong to others;

Failing to preserve for three (3) years accurate records of the firm's escrow account as prescribed by subdivision (b)(3)(C);

Failing to furnish a copy of any contract to provide vacation lodging services to all signatories of the contract at the time of execution;

Using or promoting the use of any contract to provide vacation lodging services for a residential unit that fails to specify a definite termination date;

Being convicted in a court of competent jurisdiction of this or any other state or federal court of forgery, embezzlement, obtaining money under false pretenses, bribery, larceny, extortion, conspiracy to defraud or any similar offense or offenses, or pleading guilty or nolo contendere to any such offense or offenses;

Violating any federal, state or municipal law prohibiting discrimination in the rental of real estate because of race, color, religion, sex or national origin;

Violating this subsection (b) or the terms of any lawful order entered by the commission;

Engaging in the unauthorized practice of law; or

Any conduct, whether of the same or of a different character from that specified in this subdivision (b)(7)(B), that constitutes improper, fraudulent or dishonest dealing.

The director of the division of regulatory boards or the director's duly authorized representatives may, at all reasonable hours, examine and copy the books, accounts, documents or records that are relevant to a determination of whether a licensee has properly maintained and disbursed funds from escrow or trustee accounts required in this subsection (b). In the case of refusal to permit the access accorded by this subsection (b), the director or the director's authorized representatives may pursue the remedies provided by § 4-5-311(b) for disobedience to any lawful agency requirement for information. Refusal shall also constitute grounds for the commission to suspend or revoke a license.

Whenever any licensee pleads guilty or is convicted of any criminal offense enumerated in this section, the licensee must within sixty (60) days notify the commission of that conviction and provide the commission with certified copies of the conviction. The licensee's license shall automatically be revoked sixty (60) days after the licensee's conviction unless the licensee makes a written request to the commission for a hearing during that sixty-day period. Following any hearing held pursuant to this section, the commission in its discretion may impose upon that licensee any sanction permitted by this section.

Before refusing to issue a license or suspending or revoking an existing license upon the verified written complaint of any person setting out a cause of action under subdivision (b)(7), the commission shall, in writing, notify the accused applicant or licensee of its receipt of the complaint, enclosing a copy.

The accused applicant or licensee shall, within ten (10) days, file with the commission the applicant's or licensee's answer to the complaint, a copy of which shall be transmitted to the complainant.

If, after investigation, the commission determines that the matter should have a hearing, a time and place for the hearing shall be set.

All notices and answers required or authorized to be made or filed under this subsection (b) may be served or filed personally, or by registered mail, to the last known business address of the addressee. If served personally, the time shall run from the date of service and if by registered mail, from the postmarked date of the letter enclosing the document.

The affirmative vote of a majority of the commission shall be necessary to reprimand a licensee or revoke or suspend a license.

In the event that the matter contained in the complaint has been filed or made a part of a case pending in any court in this state, the commission may then withhold its decision until the court action has been concluded.

If a designated agent, as designated by a vacation lodging service firm, leaves or moves from the vacation lodging service firm, the firm or designated agent for such firm must notify the Tennessee real estate commission within ten (10) days of such action. The vacation lodging service firm must replace the designated agent within sixty (60) days of such action and notify the commission of the name of the new designated agent. During such time period, all rules or regulations related to a vacation lodging service firm shall remain in full force and effect with respect to such a vacation lodging service firm until a designated agent is replaced. Any obligation or duty required to be fulfilled by the designated agent shall be fulfilled by another person in the vacation lodging service firm.

A designated agent may serve as a designated agent for multiple offices of the same vacation lodging service firm within a fifty (50) mile radius of the principal office of the firm, but may not serve as a designated agent for multiple firms.

The Tennessee real estate commission is authorized to promulgate rules and regulations in accordance with the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in title 4, chapter 5, to implement this subsection (b).

Acts 1973, ch. 181, § 5; 1977, ch. 207, § 1; T.C.A., § 62-1307; Acts 1988, ch. 469, § 1; 1998, ch. 881, §§ 1-4; 2003, ch. 277, §§ 1, 2; 2005, ch. 252, § 1; 2010, ch. 1147, §§ 1-14.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2010, ch. 1147, § 15 provided that if a person named as a designated agent for a vacation lodging service firm has completed the course required by § 62-13-104(b)(3)(B) to be licensed as a designated agent prior to July 1, 2011, or between June 30, 2010, and July 1, 2011, such person shall not be required to retake any such course in order to be licensed as a designated agent by the Tennessee real estate commission.

Cross-References. Certified mail instead of registered mail, § 1-3-111.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 5 Tenn. Juris., Brokers, §§ 4, 15; 12 Tenn. Juris., Executors and Administrators, § 52.

Attorney General Opinions. Real estate commission rulemaking authority for vacation lodging services. OAG 12-24, 2012 Tenn. AG LEXIS 24 (2/28/12).

Applicability of exemption provided to “corporation, foreign or domestic” in T.C.A. § 62-13-104(a)(1)(F). OAG 14-27, 2014 Tenn. AG LEXIS 28 (3/6/14).

The term “owner” in T.C.A. § 62-13-104(a)(1)(A), include corporations, limited liability companies, limited liability partnerships, or other business entities because the context makes clear that “owner” refers to a “person” who owns or leases real estate, and for purposes of T.C.A. § 62-13-104 “person” is defined as “any natural person, corporation, company, partnership, firm or association.” Business entities other than corporations, such as limited liability companies and partnership, do not qualify for the “corporate exemption” in T.C.A. § 62-13-104(a)(1)(F). They qualify, if at all, only for the “owner exemption” provided for in T.C.A. § 62-13-104(a)(1)(A). Furthermore, a corporate entity that owns less than 100% of a particular property is exempt from the broker license requirement only with respect to activities involving the specific portion of the property it owns. The license requirement would apply to any actions involving the property as a whole or specific parts of the property that the corporate entity did not own. A lessee of property is an “owner” of real estate who may qualify for the “owner exemption,” but only with respect to the lessee's ownership interest in the lease, not with respect to the entire property. Furthermore, an individual or entity who owns a percentage of a limited liability company, which in turn owns 100% of a piece of real estate, does not qualify for the “owner exemption.” OAG 19-15, 2019 Tenn. AG LEXIS 55 (9/16/2019).

62-13-105. Action by broker to collect compensation.

No action or suit shall be instituted, nor recovery be had by any person, in any court of this state for compensation for any act done or service rendered, the doing or rendering of which is prohibited under this chapter to other than by licensed brokers, affiliate brokers or time-share salespersons, unless the person was duly licensed under this chapter as a broker, affiliate broker or time-share salesperson at the time of performing or offering to perform any such act or service or procuring any promise or contract or the payment of compensation for any such contemplated act or service.

Acts 1973, ch. 181, § 6; 1981, ch. 473, § 3; T.C.A., § 62-1308; Acts 1989, ch. 89, §§ 3, 4.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 5 Tenn. Juris., Brokers, §§ 15, 23; 17 Tenn. Juris., Licenses, § 23.

62-13-106. Courses of study.

The real estate commission is authorized and empowered to promulgate rules and regulations relative to the establishment and conducting of any course, courses of study or instruction that are designed to satisfy the educational requirements of § 62-13-303. The commission shall establish application fees for educational courses submitted for approval, which fees shall be deposited in the recovery fund interest account to be used by the commission for educational purposes.

As a condition to meeting the requirements of § 62-13-303, the course, course of study or instruction shall be established and conducted in accordance with the rules and regulations of the commission.

It is unlawful for any person offering courses or conducting classes in real estate subjects to represent that its students are assured of passing examinations given by the commission for the issuance of licenses required by this chapter.

A violation of this section is a Class C misdemeanor.

Acts 1973, ch. 181, §§ 8(g), 10; 1981, ch. 473, § 15; T.C.A., § 62-1331, 62-1332; Acts 1989, ch. 324, § 1; 1989, ch. 591, § 113.

Cross-References. Penalty for Class C misdemeanor, § 40-35-111.

62-13-107. Clinics and institutes.

The real estate commission is authorized to conduct, hold or assist in conducting or holding real estate clinics, meetings, courses or institutes and to incur the necessary expenses in connection with the clinics, meetings, courses or institutes, which shall be open to all licensees.

Acts 1973, ch. 181, § 8(h); T.C.A., § 62-1333.

62-13-108. Study and research programs.

The real estate commission is authorized to assist educational institutions within this state in sponsoring studies, research and programs for the purpose of raising the standards of professional practice in real estate and the competence of licensees in the public interest.

Acts 1973, ch. 181, § 8(i); T.C.A., § 62-1334.

62-13-109. Injunctions authorized for enforcement.

In addition to the powers and duties otherwise conferred upon the commission in this chapter, the commission is empowered to petition any circuit or chancery court having jurisdiction of any person in this state who is violating this chapter, either with or without a license under this chapter, to enjoin the person from continuing the violation; and jurisdiction is conferred upon the circuit and chancery courts of this state to hear and determine the causes.

Acts 1973, ch. 181, § 18(d); T.C.A., § 62-1338.

Cross-References. Discriminatory housing practices, title 4, ch. 21, part 6.

62-13-110. Penalties.

Any person acting as a broker, affiliate broker, time-share salesperson or acquisition agent without first obtaining a license commits a Class B misdemeanor.

A corporation that violates subdivision (a)(1) is ineligible to obtain a license for a period of one (1) year from the date of conviction of the offense.

Any person acting as a broker, affiliate broker, time-share salesperson or acquisition agent without first obtaining a license who has received any money or the equivalent of money as a fee, commission, compensation or profit by or in consequence of a violation of this chapter, is, in addition, liable for a penalty of no less than the amount of the sum of money so received and no more than three (3) times the sum so received, as may be determined by the court, which penalty may be recovered in any court of competent jurisdiction by any person aggrieved.

Acts 1973, ch. 181, § 18(a), (b), (c); T.C.A., § 62-1339; Acts 1982, ch. 589, §§ 1, 2; 1982, ch. 864, §§ 11, 12; 1989, ch. 89, § 5; 1989, ch. 591, § 112; 2002, ch. 812, § 3.

Cross-References. Discriminatory housing practices, title 4, ch. 21, part 6.

Penalty for Class B misdemeanor, § 40-35-111.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 5 Tenn. Juris., Brokers, § 5.

62-13-111. Hearing and judicial review.

The Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in title 4, chapter 5, governs all matters and procedures respecting the hearing and judicial review of any contested case arising under this chapter.

Acts 1980, ch. 451, § 11; T.C.A., § 62-1343.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 5 Tenn. Juris., Brokers, § 6.

62-13-112. Errors and omissions insurance — Suspension or revocation.

Each licensee who is licensed under this chapter shall, as a condition to licensing, carry errors and omissions insurance to cover all activities contemplated under this chapter. The requirements of this section shall not apply to acquisition agents.

It is not mandatory that a person who has been issued a firm license obtain errors and omissions insurance in the name of the firm. Persons issued a firm license by the Tennessee real estate commission shall have the option of obtaining errors and omissions coverage in the name of the firm in addition to the mandatory individual coverage for the brokers and affiliate brokers within the firm.

The commission shall make the insurance required under this section available to each licensee by contracting with an insurance provider for errors and omissions insurance coverage for each licensee after competitive, sealed bidding in accordance with title 12, chapter 3.

Any policy obtained by the commission shall be available to each licensee with no right on the part of the insurance provider to cancel coverage for any licensee, other than as set forth by the commission and in compliance with § 56-7-1803.

Each licensee shall have the option of obtaining errors and omissions insurance independently, if the coverage contained in an independently obtained policy complies with the minimum requirements established by the commission.

The commission shall determine the terms and conditions of coverage required under this section, including, but not limited to, the minimum limits of coverage, the permissible deductible and the permissible exemptions.

Each licensee shall be notified of the required terms and conditions of coverage for the policy at least thirty (30) days before the licensee's renewal date. A certificate of coverage, showing compliance with the required terms and conditions of coverage, shall be filed with the commission by the license renewal date by each licensee who elects not to participate in the insurance program administered by the commission.

If the commission is unable to obtain errors and omissions insurance coverage to insure all licensees who choose to participate in the insurance program at a reasonable premium, in such amount as determined by the commission, the requirement of insurance coverage under this section shall be void during the applicable contract period.

The errors and omissions insurance coverage required by this section shall become effective as a condition of license granting or renewal on December 31, 1990.

If a licensee fails to obtain, maintain or renew the licensee's errors and omissions insurance which meets or exceeds the minimum requirements established by the commission and provide proof of compliance to the commission if such proof is required by subsection (g), then the licensee's license shall be suspended.

The commission shall send notification of the license suspension by regular mail:

To the licensee at the last known business address and home address of the licensee as registered with the commission; and

To the licensee's broker at the broker's address as registered with the commission.

While a license is suspended pursuant to this section, the licensee shall not engage in activities which require a license under this chapter, nor will the license be renewed or a new license issued. Any license suspended pursuant to this section shall remain suspended until the licensee establishes, to the satisfaction of the commission, compliance with this section.

The licensee may, upon written notice to the commission, request a formal hearing on any license suspended pursuant to this section.

A license suspended pursuant to this section shall be reinstated if, within thirty (30) days of suspension, the licensee provides proof of insurance that complies with the required terms and conditions of coverage to the commission without the payment of any fee.

A license suspended pursuant to this section shall be reinstated if, on or after thirty-one (31) days of suspension, the licensee provides proof of insurance that complies with the required terms and conditions of coverage to the commission and the licensee pays:

For a license suspended more than thirty (30) days but less than one hundred twenty (120) days, a penalty fee of not more than five hundred dollars ($500); or

For a license suspended for more than one hundred twenty (120) days but less than one (1) year, a penalty fee of five hundred dollars ($500), plus an additional penalty fee of not more than one hundred dollars ($100) per month for months six through twelve (6-12).

A license suspended more than one (1) year pursuant to this section shall be automatically revoked without any further action by the commission.

The commission shall send notification of the license revocation by regular mail:

To the licensee at the last known business address and home address of the licensee as registered with the commission; and

To the licensee's broker at the broker's address as registered with the commission.

The licensee may, upon written notice to the commission, request a formal hearing on any license revoked pursuant to this section.

Upon revocation of license, any individual seeking reissuance of such license shall reapply for licensure and pay the penalty fees in subsection (k); provided, however, that the commission may, in its discretion:

Waive reexamination or additional education requirements for such an applicant; or

Reinstate a license subject to the applicant's compliance with such reasonable conditions as the commission may prescribe, including, but not limited to, payment of a penalty fee, in addition to the penalty fee provided in subdivision (k)(2)(B), of not more than one hundred dollars ($100) per month, or any portion thereof, from the time of revocation.

Notwithstanding subsections (k) and (l ), if the licensee proves to the commission that the license suspension or revocation pursuant to subsections (k) or (l ) was in error and that the licensee obtained, maintained or renewed the licensee's errors and omissions insurance as required by this section, then the commission shall immediately reinstate the license to the date of suspension.

Acts 1989, ch. 79, § 1; 1991, ch. 305, § 1; 2002, ch. 812, § 4; 2013, ch. 84, § 1.